aghul_numerals_formation.lexd
PATTERNS
NumStem
NumStem Subst
NumStem NumCase
NumStem NumNumber NumCase
Ten TenCase
Ten NumNumber TenCase
( NumStem | Ten ) OrdSuffix
( NumStem | Ten ) AdvSuffix
( NumStem | Ten ) Distributive
IndefNum

LEXICON NumStem
са #1
lу #2
хьибу #3
якьу #4
гlуфу #5
ерхьи #6
ери #7
муй #8
ярчlу #9
ицlу #10
къад #20

LEXICON Subst
<s>:д

LEXICON Ten
хьимцlур #30
ягьцlур #40
гlафцlур #50
яхьцlур #60
ярцlур #70
муйцlур #80
ярчlзур #90

LEXICON NumCase
<nom>:
<erg>:и
<gen>:ин
<dat>:ис
<ins>:илди
<psl1>:ифай
<psl2>:ихъай
<psl3>:игlай

LEXICON TenCase
<nom>:
<erg>:а
<gen>:ан
<dat>:ас
<ins>:алди
<psl1>:афай
<psl2>:ахъай
<psl3>:агlай

LEXICON IndefNum
паратар #многие
чlукьтар #меньшие
сакьадартар #некоторые
саlудар #немногие
сахьимунасад #несколько

LEXICON NumNumber
<sg>:
<pl>:ар

LEXICON OrdSuffix
<ord>:пуф

LEXICON OrdCase
<nom>:
<erg>:ти
<gen>:тин
<dat>:тис
<ins>:тилди
<comm>:тифай
<comm>:тихъай
<comm>:тигlай


LEXICON AdvSuffix
<adv>:галай

LEXICON Distributive
<distr>:
<distr>:ди
